Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.270

Violations—Giving false information—Criminal penalties.

(1) Each person who knowingly violates this chapter or who knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the director, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing statements required by this chapter, whether or not the statement or report is verified, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) A person who violates this chapter or who gives false or incorrect information to the director, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing statements required by this chapter, whether or not the statement or report is verified, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1994 c 237 s 24.]